Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-3603
Exposure or potential exposure to COVID-19; civil action; when permitted.

A person may not bring or maintain a civil action seeking recovery for any injuries or damages sustained from exposure or potential exposure to COVID-19 on or after May 26, 2021, if the act or omission alleged to violate a duty of care was in substantial compliance with any federal public health guidance that was applicable to the person, place, or activity at issue at the time of the alleged exposure or potential exposure.

Laws 2021, LB139, § 3.

Health Care Crisis Protocol Act, see section 71-2701.